Utah statutes.
57-22-5.   Renter's duties -- Cleanliness and sanitation -- Compliance with
written agreement -- Destruction of property, interference with peaceful
enjoyment prohibited.
(1)  Each renter shall:
(a)  comply with the rules of the board of health having jurisdiction in the
area in which the residential rental unit is located which materially affect
physical health and safety;
(b)  maintain the premises occupied in a clean and safe condition and shall
not unreasonably burden any common area;
(c)  dispose of all garbage and other waste in a clean and safe manner;
(d)  maintain all plumbing fixtures in as sanitary a condition as the fixtures
permit;
(e)  use all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, and other facilities and
appliances in a reasonable manner;
(f)  occupy the residential rental unit in the manner for which it was
designed, but the renter may not increase the number of occupants above that
specified in the rental agreement without written permission of the owner;
(g)  be current on all payments required by the rental agreement; and
(h)  comply with all appropriate requirements of the rental agreement between
the owner and the renter, which may include either a prohibition on, or the
allowance of, smoking tobacco products within the residential rental unit, or
on the premises, or both.
(2)  No renter may:
(a)  intentionally or negligently destroy, deface, damage, impair, or remove
any part of the residential rental unit or knowingly permit any person to do
so;
(b)  interfere with the peaceful enjoyment of the residential rental unit of
another renter; or
(c)  unreasonably deny access to, refuse entry to, or withhold consent to
enter the residential rental unit to the owner, agent, or manager for the
purpose of making repairs to the unit.
